Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB239.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 530 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person is guilty of parentage fraud when he or she:
(a) Seeks to legally establish another person as the biological parent of a child
in the person's custody with intent to:
1. Deprive the other person of property; or
2. Prevent the child's actual biological parent from exercising parental
rights to the child; and
(b) Knows or reasonably should know that the other person is not the child's
biological parent.
(2) This section shall not apply when the:
(a) Child involved was conceived as the result of any degree of rape as
described in KRS Chapter 510 or incest as described in KRS 530.020;
(b) Child involved has been or is the process of being adopted; or
(c) Victim of the offense was the defendant's spouse at the time of the offense.
(3) Parentage fraud is a Class B misdemeanor.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:28 PM Jacketed